solr_dict/ru_RU.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2616 Y 63
SFX 2616 ный ный .
SFX 2616 ный ного .
SFX 2616 ный ному .
SFX 2616 ный ного .
SFX 2616 ный ный .
SFX 2616 ный ным .
SFX 2616 ный ном .
SFX 2616 ный ная .
SFX 2616 ный ной .
SFX 2616 ный ной .
SFX 2616 ный ную .
SFX 2616 ный ной .
SFX 2616 ный ною .
SFX 2616 ный ной .
SFX 2616 ный ное .
SFX 2616 ный ного .
SFX 2616 ный ному .
SFX 2616 ный ное .
SFX 2616 ный ным .
SFX 2616 ный ном .
SFX 2616 ный ные .
SFX 2616 ный ных .
SFX 2616 ный ным .
SFX 2616 ный ных .
SFX 2616 ный ные .
SFX 2616 ный ными .
SFX 2616 ный ных .
SFX 2616 ный ен .
SFX 2616 ный на .
SFX 2616 ный но .
SFX 2616 ный ны .
SFX 2616 ный нее .
SFX 2616 ный ней .
SFX 2616 ный нее .
SFX 2616 ный ней .
SFX 2616 ный нейший .
SFX 2616 ный нейшего .
SFX 2616 ный нейшему .
SFX 2616 ный нейшего .
SFX 2616 ный нейший .
SFX 2616 ный нейшим .
SFX 2616 ный нейшем .
SFX 2616 ный нейшая .
SFX 2616 ный нейшей .
SFX 2616 ный нейшей .
SFX 2616 ный нейшую .
SFX 2616 ный нейшей .
SFX 2616 ный нейшею .
SFX 2616 ный нейшей .
SFX 2616 ный нейшее .
SFX 2616 ный нейшего .
SFX 2616 ный нейшему .
SFX 2616 ный нейшее .
SFX 2616 ный нейшим .
SFX 2616 ный нейшем .
SFX 2616 ный нейшие .
SFX 2616 ный нейших .
SFX 2616 ный нейшим .
SFX 2616 ный нейших .
SFX 2616 ный нейшие .
SFX 2616 ный нейшими .
SFX 2616 ный нейших .
SFX 2616 ный енного .

SFX 2617 Y 90
SFX 2617 ный ный .
SFX 2617 ный ного .
SFX 2617 ный ному .
SFX 2617 ный ного .
SFX 2617 ный ный .
SFX 2617 ный ным .
SFX 2617 ный ном .
SFX 2617 ный ная .
SFX 2617 ный ной .
SFX 2617 ный ной .
SFX 2617 ный ную .
SFX 2617 ный ной .
SFX 2617 ный ною .
SFX 2617 ный ной .
SFX 2617 ный ное .
SFX 2617 ный ного .
SFX 2617 ный ному .
SFX 2617 ный ное .
SFX 2617 ный ным .
SFX 2617 ный ном .
SFX 2617 ный ные .
SFX 2617 ный ных .
SFX 2617 ный ным .
SFX 2617 ный ных .
SFX 2617 ный ные .
SFX 2617 ный ными .
SFX 2617 ный ных .
SFX 2617 ный ен .
SFX 2617 ный на .
SFX 2617 ный но .
SFX 2617 ный ны .
SFX 2617 ный нее .
SFX 2617 ный ней .
SFX 2617 ный нее .
SFX 2617 ный ней .
SFX 2617 ный нейший .
SFX 2617 ный нейший .
SFX 2617 ный нейшего .
SFX 2617 ный нейшего .
SFX 2617 ный нейшему .
SFX 2617 ный нейшему .
SFX 2617 ный нейшего .
SFX 2617 ный нейшего .
SFX 2617 ный нейший .
SFX 2617 ный нейший .
SFX 2617 ный нейшим .
SFX 2617 ный нейшим .
SFX 2617 ный нейшем .
SFX 2617 ный нейшем .
SFX 2617 ный нейшая .
SFX 2617 ный нейшая .
SFX 2617 ный нейшей .
SFX 2617 ный нейшей .
SFX 2617 ный нейшей .
SFX 2617 ный нейшей .
SFX 2617 ный нейшую .
SFX 2617 ный нейшую .
SFX 2617 ный нейшей .
SFX 2617 ный нейшей .
SFX 2617 ный нейшею .
SFX 2617 ный нейшею .
SFX 2617 ный нейшей .
SFX 2617 ный нейшей .
SFX 2617 ный нейшее .
SFX 2617 ный нейшее .
SFX 2617 ный нейшего .
SFX 2617 ный нейшего .
SFX 2617 ный нейшему .
SFX 2617 ный нейшему .
SFX 2617 ный нейшее .
SFX 2617 ный нейшее .
SFX 2617 ный нейшим .
SFX 2617 ный нейшим .
SFX 2617 ный нейшем .
SFX 2617 ный нейшем .
SFX 2617 ный нейшие .
SFX 2617 ный нейшие .
SFX 2617 ный нейших .
SFX 2617 ный нейших .
SFX 2617 ный нейшим .
SFX 2617 ный нейшим .
SFX 2617 ный нейших .
SFX 2617 ный нейших .
SFX 2617 ный нейшие .
SFX 2617 ный нейшие .
SFX 2617 ный нейшими .
SFX 2617 ный нейшими .
SFX 2617 ный нейших .
SFX 2617 ный нейших .
SFX 2617 ный емое .

SFX 2618 Y 63
SFX 2618 ьный ьный .
SFX 2618 ьный ьного .
SFX 2618 ьный ьному .
SFX 2618 ьный ьного .
SFX 2618 ьный ьный .
SFX 2618 ьный ьным .
SFX 2618 ьный ьном .
SFX 2618 ьный ьная .
SFX 2618 ьный ьной .
SFX 2618 ьный ьной .
SFX 2618 ьный ьную .
SFX 2618 ьный ьной .
SFX 2618 ьный ьною .
SFX 2618 ьный ьной .
SFX 2618 ьный ьное .
SFX 2618 ьный ьного .
SFX 2618 ьный ьному .
SFX 2618 ьный ьное .
SFX 2618 ьный ьным .
SFX 2618 ьный ьном .
SFX 2618 ьный ьные .
SFX 2618 ьный ьных .
SFX 2618 ьный ьным .
SFX 2618 ьный ьных .
SFX 2618 ьный ьные .
SFX 2618 ьный ьными .
SFX 2618 ьный ьных .
SFX 2618 ьный ен .
SFX 2618 ьный ьна .
SFX 2618 ьный ьно .
SFX 2618 ьный ьны .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнее .
SFX 2618 ьный ьней .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнее .
SFX 2618 ьный ьней .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейший .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшего .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшему .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшего .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейший .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшим .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшем .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшая .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшей .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшей .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшую .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшей .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшею .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшей .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшее .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшего .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшему .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшее .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшим .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшем .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшие .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейших .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшим .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейших .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшие .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейшими .
SFX 2618 ьный ьнейших .
SFX 2618 ьный нейшей .

SFX 2620 Y 63
SFX 2620 ый ый .
SFX 2620 ый ого .
SFX 2620 ый ому .
SFX 2620 ый ого .
SFX 2620 ый ый .
SFX 2620 ый ым .
SFX 2620 ый ом .
SFX 2620 ый ая .
SFX 2620 ый ой .
SFX 2620 ый ой .
SFX 2620 ый ую .
SFX 2620 ый ой .
SFX 2620 ый ою .
SFX 2620 ый ой .
SFX 2620 ый ое .
SFX 2620 ый ого .
SFX 2620 ый ому .
SFX 2620 ый ое .
SFX 2620 ый ым .
SFX 2620 ый ом .
SFX 2620 ый ые .
SFX 2620 ый ых .
SFX 2620 ый ым .
SFX 2620 ый ых .
SFX 2620 ый ые .
SFX 2620 ый ыми .
SFX 2620 ый ых .
SFX 2620 ый 0 .
SFX 2620 ый а .
SFX 2620 ый о .
SFX 2620 ый ы .
SFX 2620 ый ее .
SFX 2620 ый ей .
SFX 2620 ый ее .
SFX 2620 ый ей .
SFX 2620 ый ейший .
SFX 2620 ый ейшего .
SFX 2620 ый ейшему .
SFX 2620 ый ейшего .
SFX 2620 ый ейший .
SFX 2620 ый ейшим .
SFX 2620 ый ейшем .
SFX 2620 ый ейшая .
SFX 2620 ый ейшей .
SFX 2620 ый ейшей .
SFX 2620 ый ейшую .
SFX 2620 ый ейшей .
SFX 2620 ый ейшею .
SFX 2620 ый ейшей .
SFX 2620 ый ейшее .
SFX 2620 ый ейшего .
SFX 2620 ый ейшему .
SFX 2620 ый ейшее .
SFX 2620 ый ейшим .
SFX 2620 ый ейшем .
SFX 2620 ый ейшие .
SFX 2620 ый ейших .
SFX 2620 ый ейшим .
SFX 2620 ый ейших .
SFX 2620 ый ейшие .
SFX 2620 ый ейшими .
SFX 2620 ый ейших .
SFX 2620 ый нейшей .

SFX 2637 Y 64
SFX 2637 ный ный .
SFX 2637 ный ного .
SFX 2637 ный ному .
SFX 2637 ный ного .
SFX 2637 ный ный .
SFX 2637 ный ным .
SFX 2637 ный ном .
SFX 2637 ный ная .
SFX 2637 ный ной .
SFX 2637 ный ной .
SFX 2637 ный ную .
SFX 2637 ный ной .
SFX 2637 ный ною .
SFX 2637 ный ной .
SFX 2637 ный ное .
SFX 2637 ный ного .
SFX 2637 ный ному .
SFX 2637 ный ное .
SFX 2637 ный ным .
SFX 2637 ный ном .
SFX 2637 ный ные .
SFX 2637 ный ных .
SFX 2637 ный ным .
SFX 2637 ный ных .
SFX 2637 ный ные .
SFX 2637 ный ными .
SFX 2637 ный ных .
SFX 2637 ный ен .
SFX 2637 ный на .
SFX 2637 ный но .
SFX 2637 ный ны .
SFX 2637 ный ны .
SFX 2637 ный нее .
SFX 2637 ный ней .
SFX 2637 ный нее .
SFX 2637 ный ней .
SFX 2637 ный нейший .
SFX 2637 ный нейшего .
SFX 2637 ный нейшему .
SFX 2637 ный нейшего .
SFX 2637 ный нейший .
SFX 2637 ный нейшим .
SFX 2637 ный нейшем .
SFX 2637 ный нейшая .
SFX 2637 ный нейшей .
SFX 2637 ный нейшей .
SFX 2637 ный нейшую .
SFX 2637 ный нейшей .
SFX 2637 ный нейшею .
SFX 2637 ный нейшей .
SFX 2637 ный нейшее .
SFX 2637 ный нейшего .
SFX 2637 ный нейшему .
SFX 2637 ный нейшее .
SFX 2637 ный нейшим .
SFX 2637 ный нейшем .
SFX 2637 ный нейшие .
SFX 2637 ный нейших .
SFX 2637 ный нейшим .
SFX 2637 ный нейших .
SFX 2637 ный нейшие .
SFX 2637 ный нейшими .
SFX 2637 ный нейших .
SFX 2637 ный нейшее .
